Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


HB2710 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2890 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Emergency Communications Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2891 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Act:
1. "Authority" means the Oklahoma Emergency Communications
Authority created in Section 3 of this act;
2. "Executive Coordinator" means the Executive Coordinator of
the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Office created in Section 5 of
this act;
3. "FCC" means the Federal Communications Commission;
4. "Joint Executive Board for Emergency Communications" means a
joint board comprised of the board membership of the Oklahoma
Emergency Communications Authority and the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management
Authority created in Section 7 of this act;
5. "Office" means the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Office;
and
6. "Revolving fund" means the Oklahoma Emergency Communications
Authority Revolving Fund created in Section 6 of this act.

HB2710 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2892 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Emergency
Communications Authority which shall be the governing board
providing oversight, development, and regulation of state emergency
communications systems.
B. The Authority shall be composed of the following fourteen
(14) members:
1. Two members representing the Oklahoma Department of Public
Safety, to be appointed by the Commissioner of Public Safety;
2. One member representing the Oklahoma Department of
Transportation, to be appointed by the Secretary of Transportation;
3. One member representing forestry and state fire response, to
be appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture;
4. One member representing the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, to be appointed by the Chief Information
Officer;
5. One member representing the State Department of Health, to
be appointed by the State Commissioner of Health;
6. One member representing a statewide organization dedicated
to representing municipal law enforcement, to be appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate;

HB2710 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

7. One member representing a statewide organization dedicated
to representing county law enforcement, to be appointed by the
Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives;
8. One member representing a statewide organization dedicated
to representing fire service, to be appointed by the Governor;
9. One member representing a statewide organization dedicated
to representing Oklahoma municipalities, to be appointed by the
Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives;
10. One member representing a statewide organization
representing Oklahoma county commissioners, to be appointed by the
Governor;
11. One member representing a statewide organization
representing radio communications, to be appointed by the President
Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate;
12. One member representing a statewide organization
representing emergency medical services, to be appointed by the
Governor; and
13. One member representing a city or county that owns radio
infrastructure and allows state users to utilize the system for day-
to-day operations, to be appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives.
C. Members may be removed for cause. Members shall serve at
the pleasure of their appointing authority and vacancies shall be
filled by the original appointing authority. Each Authority member
HB2710 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

shal l be reaffirmed every two (2) years from the date of
appointment.
D. Members shall receive no compensation for serving on the
Authority.
E. Seven members of the Authority shall constitute a quorum,
and the vote of the majority of members present shall be necessary
for any action to be taken by the Authority.
F. The Authority shall employ an Executive Coordinator pursuant
to its role in the Joint Executive Board for Emergency
Communications as required by Section 7 of this act.
G. The Authority shall be subject to the Oklahoma Open Records
Act and the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2893 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The powers and duties of the Oklahoma Emergency Communications
Authority created in Section 3 of this act shall be to:
1. Approve or disapprove the selection of the Oklahoma
Emergency Communications Office Deputy Coordinator by majority vote
of the members. The Deputy Coordinator shall be an employee of the
Executive Coordinator of the Oklahoma Emergency Communications
Office;


HB2710 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Promulgate rules as necessary to implement the provisions of
the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Act and for the governance and
operation of the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Office;
3. Prepare grant solicitations for funding for the purposes of
assisting public agencies in joining a state-owned shared radio
system. This includes both infrastructure and radio subscribers;
4. Oversee the annual budget for the Oklahoma Emergency
Communications Office, which shall be approved by majority vote of
the members;
5. Hold contracts necessary to administer and maintain
emergency radio systems owned by the State of Oklahoma;
6. Work in conjunction with the Department of Public Safety and
Oklahoma Department of Transportation to move all funding,
contracts, and personnel related to the state-owned radio
infrastructure, including communication tower infrastructure, to the
Oklahoma Emergency Communications Office within two (2) years of the
effective date of this act;
7. Establish comprehensive user training for the state-owned
emergency radio systems;
8. Establish a strategic plan for the state emergency radio
systems to ensure optimal operability and interoperability for all
public safety responders in the state;
9. Provide guidance to public agencies regarding emergency
radio communications;
HB2710 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

10. Facilitate information-sharing among public agencies;
11. Create and maintain best practices databases for emergency
radio operations;
12. Facilitate the creation of policies and procedures between
state and local public agencies related to emergency radio
communications;
13. Encourage equipment and technology sharing among all
jurisdictions;
14. Facilitate data operability and interoperability between
public safety systems;
15. Provide oversight of the programming of the systems and
radios, including any software or keys necessary to operate on the
state radio systems;
16. Recommend standards to become compliant with Project 25 and
other common radio interoperability standards; and
17. Enable cost savings to the State of Oklahoma through
unification and enhancement of current land mobile radio public
safety systems.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2894 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created the Oklahoma Emergency Communications
Office. The Oklahoma Emergency Communications Office shall:

HB2710 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. Carry out the duties and responsibilities delegated to it by
the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Authority;
2. Manage, maintain, and seek funding for expansion of all
radio communications systems owned by the State of Oklahoma;
3. Create and maintain, no less than biannually, strategic
plans for radio communications for both state and local emergency
services. The plans shall include details pertaining to the state-
owned radio systems, integration between state systems, and
efficiencies implemented. The plan shall also include both state
and local public safety agencies that are served, underserved, and
unserved by state-owned infrastructure;
4. Implement policies as needed to provide communications
operability and interoperability for local and state users;
5. Be authorized to seek, apply for, and administer funding
through grant opportunities. The Office is authorized to administer
grant funding awards to recipients and subrecipients;
6. Ensure that all communications and radio technology,
programming, and maintenance meet Federal Communications Commission
(FCC) rules and regulations;
7. Maintain Geographic Information System (GIS) data:
a. required for the various radio systems used by local
agencies, and
b. necessary to carry out the mission of the Oklahoma
Emergency Communications Authority;
HB2710 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

8. Provide resources to assist local municipal or counties
emergency services in the procurement of radio infrastructure to
ensure FCC regulations are maintained. This includes providing
assistance to such emergency services for increasing or adding to
state-owned infrastructure to allow for operability needs;
9. Provide strategic planning and seek funding to ensure radio
tower infrastructure meets FCC rules; and
10. Provide training necessary to ensure local and state users
of public safety systems can provide emergency assistance
efficiently in order to mitigate the loss of life and property.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2895 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Authority to be designated
the "Oklahoma Emergency Communications Authority Revolving Fund".
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received from state
appropriations. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma
Emergency Communications Office, upon approval by the Oklahoma
Emergency Communications Authority, for the purpose of supporting
the administration of the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Act.
Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the
HB2710 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Stat e Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2896 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Joint Executive Board for
Emergency Communications. The Board shall consist of five (5)
members of the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority including the
chair and vice-chair and three other members of the Oklahoma 9-1-1
Management Authority, chosen by the membership of the Oklahoma 9-1-1
Management Authority. In addition, the Board shall consist of five
(5) members of the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Authority,
chosen by the membership of the Oklahoma Emergency Communications
Authority.
B. The Board shall have the power and duty to employ, evaluate,
and maintain an Executive Coordinator under the Authority who shall
oversee the operations of the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Office and the Oklahoma
Emergency Communications Office. The Executive Coordinator shall
serve as the Executive Coordinator of both Offices and shall be
responsible for implementing the policies and directives of the
respective Authorities. The Board shall establish guidelines for
the evaluation and performance review of the Executive Coordinator.

HB2710 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

The Board shall have the authority to remove or replace the
Executive Coordinator at its discretion, without cause.
C. The salary of the Executive Coordinator shall be equally
funded by both the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority and the
Oklahoma Emergency Communications Authority.
D. The Board shall meet biannually and at such other times as
necessary to fulfill its duties. A majority of the Board members
shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.11.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 193, O.S.L. 2024 (62 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 34.11.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 34.11.1. A. There is hereby created the position of
Chief Information Officer who shall be appointed by the Governor.
The Chief Information Officer, in addition to having authority over
the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, shall also serve as Secretary of Information
Technology and Telecommunications or successor cabinet position and
shall have jurisdictional areas of responsibility related to
information technology and telecommunications systems of all state
agencies as provided for in state law. The salary of the Chief
Information Officer shall not be less than One Hundred Thirty
Thousand Dollars ($130,000.00) or more than One Hundred Sixty
Thousand Dollars ($160,000.00).

HB2710 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. Any person appointed to the position of Chief Information
Officer shall meet the following eligibility requirements:
1. A baccalaureate degree in Computer Information Systems,
Information Systems or Technology Management, Business
Administration, Finance, or other similar degree;
2. A minimum of ten (10) years of professional experience with
responsibilities for management and support of information systems
and information technology, including seven (7) years of direct
management of a major information technology operation;
3. Familiarity with local and wide-area wide area network
design, implementation, and operation;
4. Experience with data and voice convergence service
offerings;
5. Experience in developing technology budgets;
6. Experience in developing requests for proposal and
administering the bid process;
7. Experience managing professional staff, teams, and
consultants;
8. Knowledge of telecommunications operations;
9. Ability to develop and set strategic direction for
information technology and telecommunications and to manage daily
development and operations functions;
10. An effective communicator who is able to build consensus;

HB2710 HFLR Page 12
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

11. Ability to analyze and resolve complex issues, both logical
and interpersonal;
12. Effective verbal and written communications skills and
effective presentation skills, geared toward coordination and
education;
13. Ability to negotiate and defuse conflict; and
14. A self-motivator, independent, cooperative, flexible and
creative.
C. The salary and any other expenses for the Chief Information
Officer shall be budgeted as a separate line item through the Office
of Management and Enterprise Services. The operating expenses of
the Information Services Division shall be set by the Chief
Information Officer and shall be budgeted as a separate line item
through the Office of Management and Enterprise Services. The
Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall provide adequate
office space, equipment and support necessary to enable the Chief
Information Officer to carry out the information technology and
telecommunications duties and responsibilities of the Chief
Information Officer and the Information Services Division.
D. 1. Within twelve (12) months of appointment, the first
Chief Information Officer shall complete an assessment, which shall
be modified annually pursuant to Section 35.5 of this title, of the
implementation of the transfer, coordination, and modernization of
all information technology and telecommunication systems of all
HB2710 HFLR Page 13
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

stat e agencies in the state as provided for in the Oklahoma
Information Services Act. The assessment shall include the
information technology and telecommunications systems of all
institutions within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and the
telecommunications network known as OneNet as assembled and
submitted by the Oklahoma Higher Education Chief Information
Officer, as designated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
2. Within twelve (12) months of appointment, the first Chief
Information Officer shall issue a report setting out a plan of
action which will include the following:
a. define the shared service model organization structure
and the reporting relationship of the recommended
organization,
b. the implementation of an information technology and
telecommunications shared services model that defines
the statewide infrastructure environment needed by
most state agencies that is not specific to individual
agencies and the shared applications that are utilized
across multiple agencies,
c. define the services that shall be in the shared
services model under the control of the Information

HB2710 HFLR Page 14
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services,
d. define the roadmap to implement the proposed shared
services model. The roadmap shall include
recommendations on the transfer, coordination, and
modernization of all information technology and
telecommunication systems of all the state agencies in
the state,
e. recommendations on the reallocation of information
technology and telecommunication resources and
personnel,
f. a cost-benefit analysis to support the recommendations
on the reallocation of information technology and
telecommunication resources and personnel,
g. a calculation of the net savings realized through the
reallocation and consolidation of information
technology and telecommunication resources and
personnel after compensating for the cost of
contracting with a private consultant as authorized in
paragraph 4 of this subsection, implementing the plan
of action, and ongoing costs of the Information
Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, and

HB2710 HFLR Page 15
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

h. the information required in subsection B of Section
35.5 of this title.
3. The plan of action report shall be presented to the
Governor, Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate.
4. The Chief Information Officer may contract with a private
consultant or consultants to assist in the assessment and
development of the plan of action report as required in this
subsection.
E. The Chief Information Officer shall be authorized to employ
personnel, fix the duties and compensation of the personnel, not
otherwise prescribed by law, and otherwise direct the work of the
personnel in performing the function functions and accomplishing the
purposes of the Information Services Division of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services.
F. The Information Services Division of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall be responsible for the
following duties:
1. Formulate and implement the information technology strategy
for all state agencies;
2. Define, design, and implement a shared services statewide
infrastructure and application environment for information
technology and telecommunications for all state agencies;

HB2710 HFLR Page 16
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

3. Direct the development and operation of a scalable
telecommunications infrastructure that supports data and voice
communications reliability, integrity, and security;
4. Supervise the applications development process for those
applications that are utilized across multiple agencies;
5. Provide direction for the professional development of
information technology staff of state agencies and oversee the
professional development of the staff of the Information Services
Division of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services;
6. Evaluate all technology and telecommunication investment
choices for all state agencies;
7. Create a plan to ensure alignment of current systems, tools,
and processes with the strategic information technology plan for all
state agencies;
8. Set direction and provide oversight for the support and
continuous upgrading of the current information technology and
telecommunication infrastructure in the state in support of enhanced
reliability, user service levels, and security;
9. Direct the development, implementation, and management of
appropriate standards, policies and procedures to ensure the success
of state information technology and telecommunication initiatives;
10. Recruit, hire and transfer the required technical staff in
the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and

HB2710 HFLR Page 17
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Ente rprise Services to support the services provided by the Division
and the execution of the strategic information technology plan;
11. Establish, maintain, and enforce information technology and
telecommunication standards;
12. Delegate, coordinate, and review all work to ensure quality
and efficient operation of the Information Services Division of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services;
13. Create and implement a communication plan that disseminates
pertinent information to state agencies on standards, policies,
procedures, service levels, project status, and other important
information to customers of the Information Services Division of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services and provide for agency
feedback and performance evaluation by customers of the Division;
14. Develop and implement training programs for state agencies
using the shared services of the Information Services Division of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services and recommend
training programs to state agencies on information technology and
telecommunication systems, products and procedures;
15. Provide counseling, performance evaluation, training,
motivation, discipline, and assign duties for employees of the
Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services;
16. For all state agencies, approve the purchasing of all
information technology and telecommunication services and approve
HB2710 HFLR Page 18
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the purchase of any information technology and telecommunication
product except the following:
a. a purchase less than or equal to Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00) if such product is purchased using a state
purchase card and the product is listed on either the
Approved Hardware or Approved Software list located on
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
website, or
b. a purchase over Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and
less than or equal to Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00) if such product is purchased using a
state purchase card, the product is listed on an
information technology or telecommunications statewide
contract, and the product is listed on either the
Approved Hardware or Approved Software list located on
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
website;
17. Develop and enforce an overall infrastructure architecture
strategy and associated roadmaps for desktop, network, server,
storage, and statewide management systems for state agencies;
18. Effectively manage the design, implementation and support
of complex, highly available infrastructure to ensure optimal
performance, on-time delivery of features, and new products, and
scalable growth;
HB2710 HFLR Page 19
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

19. Define and implement a governance model for requesting
services and monitoring service level metrics for all shared
services; and
20. Create the budget for the Information Services Division of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to be submitted to
the Legislature each year.
G. The State Governmental Technology Applications Review Board
shall provide ongoing oversight of the implementation of the plan of
action required in subsection D of this section. Any proposed
amendments to the plan of action shall be approved by the Board
prior to adoption.
H. 1. The Chief Information Officer shall act as the
Information Technology and Telecommunications Purchasing Director
for all state agencies and shall be responsible for the procurement
of all information technology and telecommunication software,
hardware, equipment, peripheral devices, maintenance, consulting
services, high technology systems, and other related information
technology, data processing, telecommunication and related
peripherals and services for all state agencies. The Chief
Information Officer shall establish, implement, and enforce policies
and procedures for the procurement of information technology and
telecommunication software, hardware, equipment, peripheral devices,
maintenance, consulting services, high technology systems, and other
related information technology, data processing, telecommunication
HB2710 HFLR Page 20
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

and related peripherals and services by purchase, lease-purchase,
lease with option to purchase, lease and rental for all state
agencies. The procurement policies and procedures established by
the Chief Information Officer shall be consistent with The the
Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act.
2. The Chief Information Officer, or any employee or agent of
the Chief Information Officer acting within the scope of delegated
authority, shall have the same power and authority regarding the
procurement of all information technology and telecommunication
products and services as outlined in paragraph 1 of this subsection
for all state agencies as the State Purchasing Director has for all
acquisitions used or consumed by state agencies as established in
The the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act. Such authority shall,
consistent with the authority granted to the State Purchasing
Director pursuant to Section 85.10 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, include the power to designate financial or proprietary
information submitted by a bidder confidential and reject all
requests to disclose the information so designated, if the Chief
Information Officer requires the bidder to submit the financial or
proprietary information with a bid, proposal, or quotation.
3. The Chief Information Officer or any employee or agent,
pursuant to paragraph 2 of this subsection, shall seek guidance and
recommendations from the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Office

HB2710 HFLR Page 21
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Exec utive Coordinator for all purchases related to public safety
communications.
4. When available, state-owned fiber shall be used to support
the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Office's duties and
responsibilities.
I. The Information Services Division of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services and the Chief Information Officer
shall be subject to the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act for the
approval and purchase of all equipment, products, and services and
shall also be subject to the requirements of the Public Competitive
Bidding Act of 1974, the Oklahoma Lighting Energy Conservation Act
and the Public Building Construction and Planning Act. The Chief
Information Officer shall be authorized to delegate all or some of
the procurement of information technology and telecommunication
products and services and construction of facilities and
telecommunication networks to another state entity if the Chief
Information Officer determines it to be cost-effective and in the
best interest of the state. The Chief Information Officer shall
have authority to designate information technology and
telecommunication contracts as statewide contracts and mandatory
statewide contracts pursuant to Section 85.5 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes and to negotiate consolidation contracts,
enterprise agreements and high technology systems contracts. Any
contract entered into by a state agency for which the Chief
HB2710 HFLR Page 22
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Info rmation Officer has not acted as the Information Technology and
Telecommunications Purchasing Director, as required in this
subsection or subsection H of this section, shall be deemed to be
unenforceable and the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
shall not process any claim associated with the provisions thereof.
J. The Chief Information Officer shall establish, implement,
and enforce policies and procedure procedures for the development
and procurement of an interoperable radio communications system for
state agencies. The Chief Information Officer shall work with local
governmental entities in developing the interoperable radio
communications system.
K. The Chief Information Officer shall develop and implement a
plan to utilize open source technology and products for the
information technology and telecommunication systems of all state
agencies.
L. All state agencies and authorities of this state and all
officers and employees of those entities shall work and cooperate
with and lend assistance to the Chief Information Officer and the
Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services and provide any and all information requested by
the Chief Information Officer.
M. The Chief Information Officer shall prepare an annual report
detailing the ongoing net saving savings attributable to the
reallocation and consolidation of information technology and
HB2710 HFLR Page 23
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

tele communication resources and personnel and shall submit the
report to the Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate.
N. For purposes of the Oklahoma Information Services Act,
unless otherwise provided for, "state agencies" shall include any
office, officer, bureau, board, commission, counsel, unit, division,
body, authority or institution of the executive branch of state
government, whether elected or appointed; provided, except with
respect to the provisions of subsection D of this section, the term
"state agencies" shall not include institutions within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education, the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education and the telecommunications network known as OneNet.
O. As used in this section:
1. "High technology system" means advanced technological
equipment, software, communication lines, and services for the
processing, storing, and retrieval of information by a state agency;
2. "Consolidation contract" means a contract for several state
or public agencies for the purpose of purchasing information
technology and telecommunication goods and services; and
3. "Enterprise agreement" means an agreement for information
technology or telecommunication goods and services with a supplier
who manufactures, develops and designs products and provides
services that are used by one or more state agencies.
HB2710 HFLR Page 24
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.20, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 34.20. In addition to the powers and duties as defined
elsewhere in this title, the Information Services Division of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall:
1. Coordinate statewide planning and approve statewide
contracts for communication and telecommunications needs of state
agencies, including, but not limited to, voice, data, radio
including the interoperable radio communications system for state
agencies, video, broadband, Wi-Fi or wireless networking, Global
Positioning Systems (GPS), Internet, eGovernment, as referenced in
Sections 34.24 and 34.25 of this title, and facsimile transmissions
through analysis of the telecommunications and information
technology plan of each agency;
2. In coordination with the Oklahoma Emergency Communications
Office of Homeland Security, establish minimum mandatory standards
and protocols for:
a. communication networks and equipment,
b. wide area and local area systems,
c. integration of equipment, systems and joint usage,
d. Internet and eGovernment,
e. operating systems or methods to be used to meet
communications requirements efficiently, effectively,
and securely,
HB2710 HFLR Page 25
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

f. rendering of aid between state government and its
political subdivisions with respect to organizing of
communications systems, and
g. an economical and cost-effective utilization of
communication services.
The standards and protocols shall be compatible with the
standards and protocols established for the Oklahoma Government
Telecommunications Network;
3. Serve as a focal point for all statewide projects and
approve all statewide contracts for state agencies involving current
communications vendors where the focus of such authority can
substantially enhance the state communications plan or the savings
which can be achieved thereunder;
4. Provide, when requested by political subdivisions of the
state, for the organizing of communications or telecommunications
systems and service between the state and its political subdivisions
and enter into agreements to effect the purposes of this section;
5. Cooperate with any federal, state or local emergency
management agency in providing for emergency communications and
telecommunication services;
6. Apply for, receive, and hold, or assist agencies in applying
for, receiving or holding, such authorizations, licenses and
allocations of channels and frequencies to carry out the purposes of
this section;
HB2710 HFLR Page 26
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

7. Accomplish such other purposes as may be necessary or
incidental to the administration of its authority or functions
pursuant to law; and
8. Provide support for telecommunication networks of state
agencies through analysis of the telecommunications needs and
requirements of each agency and promotion of the use of the Oklahoma
Government Telecommunications Network.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2862, as
last amended by Section 146, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 2862), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2862. As used in the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management
Authority Act:
1. "Area served" means the geographic area which shall be
served by the 9-1-1 emergency telephone service provided by the
governing body of a county, municipality, part of a county or
combination of such governing bodies;
2. "Authority" means the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority
created in Section 2863 of this title;
3. "Emergency telephone service" means any telephone system
utilizing a three-digit number, nine-one-one (9-1-1), for reporting
an emergency to the appropriate public agency providing law
enforcement, fire, medical or other emergency services, including
ancillary communications systems and personnel necessary to pass the

HB2710 HFLR Page 27
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

repo rted emergency to the appropriate emergency service and
personnel;
4. "Emergency telephone fee" means a fee to finance the
operation of emergency telephone service;
5. "Oklahoma 9-1-1 Executive Coordinator" means the Executive
Coordinator of the Authority;
6. "Governing body" means the board of county commissioners of
a county, the city council, tribal authority or other governing body
of a municipality, or a combination of such boards, councils or
other municipal governing bodies including county or municipal
beneficiary public trusts, or other public trusts which shall have
an administering board;
6. 7. "Landline telecommunications connection" means a ten-
digit access number assigned to a customer that utilizes analog
communications over a wired transmission line that travels
underground or on telephone poles;
7. 8. "Local exchange telephone company" means any company
providing exchange telephone services to any service user in this
state, and shall include any competitive local exchange carrier as
defined in Section 139.102 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. 9. "Next-generation 9-1-1" or "NG9-1-1" means an:
a. IP-based system comprised of hardware, software, data,
and operational policies and procedures that:

HB2710 HFLR Page 28
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(1) provides standardized interfaces from emergency
call and message services to support emergency
communications,
(2) processes all types of emergency calls, including
voice, text, data and multimedia information,
(3) acquires and integrates additional emergency call
data useful to call routing and handling,
(4) delivers the emergency calls, messages and data
to the appropriate public safety answering point
and other appropriate emergency entities,
(5) supports data or video communications needs for
coordinated incident response and management, and
(6) provides broadband service to public safety
answering points or other first responder
entities, or
b. IP-based system comprised of hardware, software, data
and operational policies and procedures that conforms
with subsequent amendments made to the definition of
Next Generation 9-1-1 services in Public Law 112-96;
9. 10. "9-1-1 emergency telephone service" means any telephone
system whereby telephone subscribers may utilize a three-digit
number (9-1-1) for reporting an emergency to the appropriate public
agency providing law enforcement, fire, medical or other emergency
services, including ancillary communications systems and personnel
HB2710 HFLR Page 29
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

nece ssary to pass the reported emergency to the appropriate
emergency service and which the wireless service provider is
required to provide pursuant to the Federal Communications
Commission Order 94-102 (961 Federal Register 40348);
10. 11. "9-1-1 wireless telephone fee" means the fee imposed in
Section 2865 of this title to finance the installation and operation
of emergency 9-1-1 services and any necessary equipment;
11. 12. "Person" means any service user, including, but not
limited to, any individual, firm, partnership, co-partnership, joint
venture, association, cooperative organization, private corporation,
whether organized for profit or not, fraternal organization,
nonprofit organization, estate, trust, business or common law trust,
receiver, assignee for the benefit of creditors, trustee or trustee
in bankruptcy, the United States of America, the state, any
political subdivision of the state, or any federal or state agency,
department, commission, board or bureau;
12. 13. "Place of primary use" means the street address
representative of where the use of the mobile telecommunications
service of the customer primarily occurs, which shall be the
residential street address or the primary business street address of
the customer and shall be within the licensed service area of the
home service provider in accordance with Section 55001 of Title 68
of the Oklahoma Statutes and the federal Mobile Telecommunications

HB2710 HFLR Page 30
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Sour cing Act, P.L. No. 106-252, codified at 4 U.S.C. 116-126,
Sections 116 through 126;
13. 14. "Prepaid wireless telecommunications service" means a
telecommunications wireless service that provides the right to
utilize mobile wireless service as well as other telecommunications
services including the download of digital products delivered
electronically, content and ancillary services, which are paid for
in advance and sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the
number declines with use in a known amount;
14. 15. "Proprietary information" means wireless service
provider or VoIP service provider, subscriber, market share, cost
and review information;
15. 16. "Public agency" means any city, town, county, municipal
corporation, public district, public trust, substate planning
district, public authority or tribal authority located within this
state which provides or has authority to provide firefighting, law
enforcement, ambulance, emergency medical or other emergency
services;
16. 17. "Public safety answering point" or "PSAP" means an
entity responsible for receiving 9-1-1 calls and processing those
calls according to specific operational policy;
17. 18. "Public safety telecommunicator" means a person who
performs a public service by processing, analyzing, and dispatching
calls for emergency assistance. The person is a first responder
HB2710 HFLR Page 31
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

that provides pre-arrival instructions and has specialized training
to mitigate the loss of life and property;
18. 19. "Service user" means any person who is provided
exchange telephone service in this state;
19. 20. "Tariff rate" means the rate or rates billed by a local
exchange telephone company stated in tariffs applicable for such
company, as approved by the Oklahoma Corporation Commission, or the
current equivalent of such rates, which represent the recurring
charges of such local exchange telephone company for exchange
telephone service or its equivalent, exclusive of all taxes, fees,
licenses or similar charges whatsoever;
20. 21. "Wireless service provider" means a provider of
commercial mobile service under Section 332(d) of the
Telecommunications Act of 1996, 47 U.S.C., Section 151 et seq.,
Federal Communications Commission rules, and the Omnibus Budget
Reconciliation Act of 1993, Pub. L. No. 103-66, and includes a
provider of wireless two-way communication service, radio-telephone
communications related to cellular telephone service, network radio
access lines or the equivalent, and personal communication service.
The term does not include a provider of:
a. a service whose users do not have access to 9-1-1
service,
b. a communication channel used only for data
transmission, or
HB2710 HFLR Page 32
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

c. a wireless roaming service or other nonlocal radio
access line service;
21. 22. "Wireless telecommunications connection" means the ten-
digit access number assigned to a customer regardless of whether
more than one such number is aggregated for the purpose of billing a
service user; and
22. 23. "Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP) provider" means a
provider of interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol service to
end users in the state, including resellers.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2864, as
last amended by Section 7, Chapter 258, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 2864), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2864. The powers and duties of the Oklahoma 9-1-1
Management Authority created in Section 2863 of this title shall be
to:
1. Employ an Oklahoma 9-1-1 Executive Coordinator pursuant to
its role in the Joint Executive Board for Emergency Communications
as required by Section 7 of this act;
2. Approve or disapprove the selection of the Oklahoma 9-1-1
Coordinator Deputy Coordinator by majority vote of the members. The
Authority shall direct the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Coordinator to administer
grants approved by the Authority pursuant to this section and
perform other duties as it deems necessary to accomplish the

HB2710 HFLR Page 33
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

requ irements of the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority Act Deputy
Coordinator shall be an employee of the Executive Coordinator;
2. 3. Prepare grant solicitations for funding for the purposes
of assisting public agencies with funding for consolidation of
facilities or services, deployment of Phase II technology or
successor technology, development of next-generation 9-1-1 regional
emergency service networks, and for other purposes it deems
appropriate and necessary;
3. 4. Work in conjunction with the Oklahoma Department of
Emergency Management and Homeland Security to create an annual
budget for the Authority, which shall be approved by majority vote
of the members;
4. 5. Direct the Oklahoma Tax Commission to escrow all or any
portion of funds collected pursuant to the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management
Authority Act attributable to a public agency, if the public agency
fails to:
a. submit or comply with master plans to deliver Next
Generation next-generation 9-1-1 (NG9-1-1) services as
required by the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority
Act and approved by the Authority. Local plans must
align with the State's Master state's master plan to
deploy NG9-1-1,
b. meet standards of the National Emergency Number
Association (NENA) limited to call-taking and caller-
HB2710 HFLR Page 34
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

location technology or comply with an improvement plan
to meet such standards as directed by the Authority,
c. submit annual reports or audits as required by the
Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority Act,
d. provide connectivity and interoperability between
state, regional and local next-generation 9-1-1
systems, or
e. comply with the requirements of the Oklahoma 9-1-1
Management Authority Act or procedures established by
the Authority;
5. 6. Establish and submit to the Tax Commission a list of
eligible governing bodies entitled to receive 9-1-1 telephone fees
and establish annual population figures and square miles for the
coverage area of the public safety answering points (PSAPs) for the
purpose of distributing fees collected pursuant to Section 2865 of
this title. Distribution of the net monthly revenue from 9-1-1 fees
after the distributions established in Sections 2865, 2866, and 2867
of this title will be provided to eligible governing bodies
established by this section as follows:
a. a flat rate of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) per
month per PSAP, and
b. from the remaining balance:
(1) ten percent (10%) to be derived by dividing the
land area covered by each public agency's
HB2710 HFLR Page 35
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

response area by the total land area of the
state, and
(2) ninety percent (90%) to be derived by dividing
the population of each public agency's response
area by the total population of the state using
data from the latest available Census estimates
as of July 1 of each year;
6. 7. Assist any public agency the Authority determines is
performing below NENA standards, as limited by paragraph 4 5 of this
section, according to the improvement plan required by the Oklahoma
9-1-1 Management Authority Act. The Authority shall establish a
time period for the public agency to come into compliance, after
which the Authority shall escrow funds as authorized in this
section. Improvement plans may include consideration and
recommendations for consolidation with other public agencies, and
sharing equipment and technology with other jurisdictions;
7. 8. Require an annual report from public agencies regarding
operations and financing of the public safety answering point (PSAP)
PSAP and approve, modify or reject such reports;
8. 9. Conduct and review audits and financial records of the
wireless service providers and review public agencies' audits and
financial records regarding the collection, remittance and
expenditures of 9-1-1 wireless telephone fees as required by the
Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority Act;
HB2710 HFLR Page 36
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

9. 10. Develop a master plan to deploy next-generation 9-1-1
NG9-1-1 services statewide. This will include the development of
performance criteria critical to the function and performance of
NG9-1-1 networks and systems;
10. 11. Establish rules for interoperability between state,
regional and local NG9-1-1 systems;
11. 12. Facilitate information-sharing among public agencies;
12. 13. Create and maintain best practices databases for PSAP
operations;
13. 14. Encourage equipment- and technology-sharing among all
jurisdictions;
14. 15. Develop training program standards for public safety
telecommunicators for call-taking. Training program standards shall
include instruction on recognizing the need for and delivery of
High-Quality Telecommunicator CPR (T-CPR) that can be delivered by
9-1-1 public safety telecommunicators for acute events requiring CPR
including, but not limited to, out-of-hospital cardiac events
(OHCA);
15. 16. Mediate disputes between public agencies and other
entities involved in providing 9-1-1 emergency telephone services;
16. 17. Provide a clearinghouse of contact information for
communications service companies and PSAPs operating in this state;
17. 18. Make recommendations for consolidation upon the request
of public agencies;
HB2710 HFLR Page 37
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

18. 19. Establish contracts for the necessary equipment and
services to deliver 9-1-1 calls to the public safety answering
points PSAPs;
19. 20. Establish an eligible use list for 9-1-1 funds; and
20. 21. Take any steps necessary to carry out the duties
required by the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority Act.
SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2865, as
amended by Section 8, Chapter 258, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 2865), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2865. A. There shall be imposed a 9-1-1 telephone fee
as follows:
1. One Dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) monthly on each
wireless telephone connection and other wireless communication
device or service connection with the ability to dial 9-1-1 for
emergency calls;
2. One Dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) monthly on each
service with the ability to dial 9-1-1 for emergency calls,
including landline; and
3. One Dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) on each prepaid
wireless retail transaction occurring in this state.
B. 1. For purposes of paragraph 3 of subsection A of this
section, a retail transaction that is effected in person by a
consumer at a business location of the seller shall be treated as
occurring in this state if that business location is in this state.
HB2710 HFLR Page 38
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Any other retail transaction shall be sourced as provided in
paragraphs 2 through 5 of this subsection as applicable.
2. When the retail transaction does not occur at a business
location of the seller, the retail transaction shall be sourced to
the location where receipt by the consumer, or the consumer’s donee,
designated as such by the consumer, occurs, including the location
indicated by instructions for delivery to the consumer or donee,
known to the seller.
3. When the provisions of paragraph 2 of this subsection do not
apply, the sale shall be sourced to the location indicated by an
address for the consumer that is available from the business records
of the seller that are maintained in the ordinary course of the
seller’s business when use of this address does not constitute bad
faith.
4. When the provisions of paragraphs 2 and 3 of this subsection
do not apply, the sale shall be sourced to the location indicated by
an address for the consumer obtained during the consummation of the
sale, including the address of a consumer’s payment instrument, if
no other address is available, when use of this address does not
constitute bad faith.
5. When none of the previous rules of paragraphs 1, 2, 3 and 4
of this subsection apply, including the circumstance in which the
seller is without sufficient information to apply the previous
rules, then the location shall be determined by the address from
HB2710 HFLR Page 39
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

whic h the service was provided, disregarding for these purposes any
location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product
sold. If the seller knows the mobile telephone number, the location
will be that which is associated with the mobile telephone number.
C. From each one-dollar-and-twenty-five-cent fee assessed and
collected pursuant to subsection A of this section, twenty-two cents
($0.22) shall be deposited into the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management
Authority Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 2869 of this
title. Funds accumulating in this revolving fund shall be used to
fund the salary of the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Executive Coordinator and any
administrative staff, operations of the Authority and any costs
associated with the administration of the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management
Authority Act within the Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management
and Homeland Security, and for grants approved by the Authority for
purposes as authorized in the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority
Act.
SECTION 13. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 51.1a, as
last amended by Section 2, Chapter 257, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 51.1a), is amended to read as follows:
Section 51.1a. A. In addition to the powers and duties as
defined elsewhere in statute, the Oklahoma Emergency Communications
Office of Homeland Security has the duty and responsibility for
interoperable public safety communications planning within this

HB2710 HFLR Page 40
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

stat e. As part of this duty, the Oklahoma Emergency Communications
Office of Homeland Security shall:
1. Annually develop and electronically report to the Governor,
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate, and Speaker of
the Oklahoma House of Representatives, the Statewide Communications
Interoperability Plan;
2. Coordinate statewide planning for public safety
communication needs of state government and state emergency
responders, including a migration plan for state agency use of
public safety communications technologies and rendering of aid
between state government and its political subdivisions for
organizing and use of disparate public safety communications
systems;
3. Serve as a focal point for all state-level projects
involving public safety communications vendors where the focus of
such authority can substantially enhance the state communications
plan or savings;
4. Apply for, receive and hold, or assist state agencies in
applying for, receiving or holding, such authorizations, licenses,
and allocations of channels and frequencies to carry out the
purposes of this section;
5. Establish minimum standards and protocols for the
acquisition, development, or enhancement of public safety
communications technologies. These standards shall be utilized by
HB2710 HFLR Page 41
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services pursuant to the provisions of Section 34.20 of
Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
6. Accomplish such other purposes as may be necessary or
incidental to the administration of its authority or functions
pursuant to law.
B. It is the intent of the Legislature that all state public
entities comply with the provisions of the Statewide Communications
Interoperability Plan issued by the Oklahoma Emergency
Communications Office of Homeland Security. All state agencies are
required to review the provisions of the Statewide Communications
Interoperability Plan and the public safety communications standards
issued by the Oklahoma Emergency Communications Office of Homeland
Security prior to the purchase, acquisition, development, or
enhancement of any public safety communications system. Local
public safety agencies and political subdivisions of the state are
encouraged, but not required, to review the provisions of the
Statewide Communications Interoperability Plan and the public safety
communications standards issued by the Oklahoma Emergency
Communications Office of Homeland Security prior to the purchase,
acquisition, development, or enhancement of any public safety
communications system to assist the local public safety agency or
political subdivision in purchasing decisions.

HB2710 HFLR Page 42
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

C. Homeland Security shall ensure that all Federal and State
grant funding for radio and data communications meets the State
Communications Plan that is approved by the Oklahoma Emergency
Communications Authority.
D. No state agency shall use state funds or enter into any
agreement for the acquisition, development, or enhancement of a
public safety communication system unless the request is consistent
with the Statewide Communications Interoperability Plan and the
public safety communications standards issued by the Oklahoma
Emergency Communications Office of Homeland Security.
SECTION 14. REPEALER 62 O.S. 2021, Section 35.6.2, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 15. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/06/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.









HB2710 HFLR Page 43
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.